Illinois, session 104th, SB1704.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Horse Racing Act of 1975 is 5amended by changing Section 6 as follows: 6    (230 ILCS 5/6)  (from Ch. 8, par. 37-6)7    Sec. 6. Restrictions on Board members. 8    (a) No person shall be appointed a member of the Board or 9continue to be a member of the Board if the person or any 10member of their immediate family is a member of the Board of 11Directors, employee, or financially interested in any of the 12following: (i) any licensee or other person who has applied 13for racing dates to the Board, or the operations thereof 14including, but not limited to, concessions, data processing, 15track maintenance, track security, and pari-mutuel operations, 16located, scheduled or doing business within the State of 17Illinois, (ii) any race horse competing at a meeting under the 18Board's jurisdiction, or (iii) any licensee under the Illinois 19Gambling Act. 20    (b) No person shall be a member of the Board who is not of 21good moral character or who has been convicted of, or is under 22indictment for, a felony under the laws of Illinois or any 23other state, or the United States.  SB1704- 2 -LRB104 03002 LNS 13020 b1    (c) No member of the Board or employee shall engage in any 2political activity.3    For the purposes of this subsection (c):4    "Political" means any activity in support of or in 5connection with any campaign for State or local elective 6office or any political organization, but does not include 7activities (i) relating to the support or opposition of any 8executive, legislative, or administrative action (as those 9terms are defined in Section 2 of the Lobbyist Registration 10Act), (ii) relating to collective bargaining, or (iii) that 11are otherwise in furtherance of the person's official State 12duties or governmental and public service functions.13    "Political organization" means a party, committee, 14association, fund, or other organization (whether or not 15incorporated) that is required to file a statement of 16organization with the State Board of Elections or county clerk 17under Section 9-3 of the Election Code, but only with regard to 18those activities that require filing with the State Board of 19Elections or county clerk. 20    (d) Board members and employees may not engage in 21communications or any activity that may cause or have the 22appearance of causing a conflict of interest. A conflict of 23interest exists if a situation influences or creates the 24appearance that it may influence judgment or performance of 25regulatory duties and responsibilities. This prohibition shall 26extend to any act identified by Board action that, in the   SB1704- 3 -LRB104 03002 LNS 13020 b1judgment of the Board, could represent the potential for or 2the appearance of a conflict of interest.3    (e) Board members and employees may not accept any gift, 4gratuity, service, compensation, travel, lodging, or thing of 5value, with the exception of unsolicited items of an 6incidental nature, from any person, corporation, limited 7liability company, or entity doing business with the Board.8    (f) A Board member or employee shall not use or attempt to 9use his or her official position to secure, or attempt to 10secure, any privilege, advantage, favor, or influence for 11himself or herself or others. No Board member or employee, 12within a period of one year immediately preceding nomination 13by the Governor or employment, shall have been employed or 14received compensation or fees for services from a person or 15entity, or its parent or affiliate, that has engaged in 16business with the Board, a licensee or a licensee under the 17Illinois Gambling Act. In addition, all Board members and 18employees are subject to the restrictions set forth in Section 195-45 of the State Officials and Employees Ethics Act. 20(Source: P.A. 101-31, eff. 6-28-19.) 21    Section 10. The Illinois Gambling Act is amended by 22changing Section 5 as follows: 23    (230 ILCS 10/5)  (from Ch. 120, par. 2405)24    Sec. 5. Gaming Board.   SB1704- 4 -LRB104 03002 LNS 13020 b1    (a) (1) There is hereby established the Illinois Gaming 2Board, which shall have the powers and duties specified in 3this Act, and all other powers necessary and proper to fully 4and effectively execute this Act for the purpose of 5administering, regulating, and enforcing the system of 6riverboat and casino gambling established by this Act and 7gaming pursuant to an organization gaming license issued under 8this Act. Its jurisdiction shall extend under this Act to 9every person, association, corporation, partnership and trust 10involved in riverboat and casino gambling operations and 11gaming pursuant to an organization gaming license issued under 12this Act in the State of Illinois.13    (2) The Board shall consist of 5 members to be appointed by 14the Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate, one of 15whom shall be designated by the Governor to be chairperson. 16Each member shall have a reasonable knowledge of the practice, 17procedure and principles of gambling operations. Each member 18shall either be a resident of Illinois or shall certify that he 19or she will become a resident of Illinois before taking 20office. 21    On and after the effective date of this amendatory Act of 22the 101st General Assembly, new appointees to the Board must 23include the following:24        (A) One member who has received, at a minimum, a 25    bachelor's degree from an accredited school and at least 26    10 years of verifiable experience in the fields of   SB1704- 5 -LRB104 03002 LNS 13020 b1    investigation and law enforcement.2        (B) One member with experience in auditing and with 3    knowledge of complex corporate structures and 4    transactions.5        (C) One member who has 5 years' experience as a 6    principal, senior officer, or director of a company or 7    business with either material responsibility for the daily 8    operations and management of the overall company or 9    business or material responsibility for the policy making 10    of the company or business.11        (D) One member who is an attorney licensed to practice 12    law in Illinois for at least 5 years.13    Notwithstanding any provision of this subsection (a), the 14requirements of subparagraphs (A) through (D) of this 15paragraph (2) shall not apply to any person reappointed 16pursuant to paragraph (3).17    No more than 3 members of the Board may be from the same 18political party. No Board member shall, within a period of one 19year immediately preceding nomination, have been employed or 20received compensation or fees for services from a person or 21entity, or its parent or affiliate, that has engaged in 22business with the Board, a licensee, or a licensee under the 23Illinois Horse Racing Act of 1975. Board members must publicly 24disclose all prior affiliations with gaming interests, 25including any compensation, fees, bonuses, salaries, and other 26reimbursement received from a person or entity, or its parent   SB1704- 6 -LRB104 03002 LNS 13020 b1or affiliate, that has engaged in business with the Board, a 2licensee, or a licensee under the Illinois Horse Racing Act of 31975. This disclosure must be made within 30 days after 4nomination but prior to confirmation by the Senate and must be 5made available to the members of the Senate.6    (3) The terms of office of the Board members shall be 3 7years, except that the terms of office of the initial Board 8members appointed pursuant to this Act will commence from the 9effective date of this Act and run as follows: one for a term 10ending July 1, 1991, 2 for a term ending July 1, 1992, and 2 11for a term ending July 1, 1993. Upon the expiration of the 12foregoing terms, the successors of such members shall serve a 13term for 3 years and until their successors are appointed and 14qualified for like terms. Vacancies in the Board shall be 15filled for the unexpired term in like manner as original 16appointments. Each member of the Board shall be eligible for 17reappointment at the discretion of the Governor with the 18advice and consent of the Senate.19    (4) Each member of the Board shall receive $300 for each 20day the Board meets and for each day the member conducts any 21hearing pursuant to this Act. Each member of the Board shall 22also be reimbursed for all actual and necessary expenses and 23disbursements incurred in the execution of official duties.24    (5) No person shall be appointed a member of the Board or 25continue to be a member of the Board who is, or whose spouse, 26child or parent is, a member of the board of directors of, or a   SB1704- 7 -LRB104 03002 LNS 13020 b1person financially interested in, any gambling operation 2subject to the jurisdiction of this Board, or any race track, 3race meeting, racing association or the operations thereof 4subject to the jurisdiction of the Illinois Racing Board. No 5Board member shall hold any other public office. No person 6shall be a member of the Board who is not of good moral 7character or who has been convicted of, or is under indictment 8for, a felony under the laws of Illinois or any other state, or 9the United States.10    (5.5) No member of the Board shall engage in any political 11activity. For the purposes of this Section, "political" means 12any activity in support of or in connection with any campaign 13for federal, State, or local elective office or any political 14organization, but does not include activities (i) relating to 15the support or opposition of any executive, legislative, or 16administrative action (as those terms are defined in Section 2 17of the Lobbyist Registration Act), (ii) relating to collective 18bargaining, or (iii) that are otherwise in furtherance of the 19person's official State duties or governmental and public 20service functions. 21    (6) Any member of the Board may be removed by the Governor 22for neglect of duty, misfeasance, malfeasance, or nonfeasance 23in office or for engaging in any political activity.24    (7) Before entering upon the discharge of the duties of 25his office, each member of the Board shall take an oath that he 26will faithfully execute the duties of his office according to   SB1704- 8 -LRB104 03002 LNS 13020 b1the laws of the State and the rules and regulations adopted 2therewith and shall give bond to the State of Illinois, 3approved by the Governor, in the sum of $25,000. Every such 4bond, when duly executed and approved, shall be recorded in 5the office of the Secretary of State. Whenever the Governor 6determines that the bond of any member of the Board has become 7or is likely to become invalid or insufficient, he shall 8require such member forthwith to renew his bond, which is to be 9approved by the Governor. Any member of the Board who fails to 10take oath and give bond within 30 days from the date of his 11appointment, or who fails to renew his bond within 30 days 12after it is demanded by the Governor, shall be guilty of 13neglect of duty and may be removed by the Governor. The cost of 14any bond given by any member of the Board under this Section 15shall be taken to be a part of the necessary expenses of the 16Board.17    (7.5) For the examination of all mechanical, 18electromechanical, or electronic table games, slot machines, 19slot accounting systems, sports wagering systems, and other 20electronic gaming equipment, and the field inspection of such 21systems, games, and machines, for compliance with this Act, 22the Board shall utilize the services of independent outside 23testing laboratories that have been accredited in accordance 24with ISO/IEC 17025 by an accreditation body that is a 25signatory to the International Laboratory Accreditation 26Cooperation Mutual Recognition Arrangement Agreement   SB1704- 9 -LRB104 03002 LNS 13020 b1signifying they are qualified to perform such examinations. 2Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the Board shall 3consider the licensing of independent outside testing 4laboratory applicants in accordance with procedures 5established by the Board by rule. The Board shall not withhold 6its approval of an independent outside testing laboratory 7license applicant that has been accredited as required under 8this paragraph (7.5) and is licensed in gaming jurisdictions 9comparable to Illinois. Upon the finalization of required 10rules, the Board shall license independent testing 11laboratories and accept the test reports of any licensed 12testing laboratory of the system's, game's, or machine 13manufacturer's choice, notwithstanding the existence of 14contracts between the Board and any independent testing 15laboratory. 16    (8) The Board shall employ such personnel as may be 17necessary to carry out its functions and shall determine the 18salaries of all personnel, except those personnel whose 19salaries are determined under the terms of a collective 20bargaining agreement. No person shall be employed to serve the 21Board who is, or whose spouse, parent or child is, an official 22of, or has a financial interest in or financial relation with, 23any operator engaged in gambling operations within this State 24or any organization engaged in conducting horse racing within 25this State. For the one year immediately preceding employment, 26an employee shall not have been employed or received   SB1704- 10 -LRB104 03002 LNS 13020 b1compensation or fees for services from a person or entity, or 2its parent or affiliate, that has engaged in business with the 3Board, a licensee, or a licensee under the Illinois Horse 4Racing Act of 1975. Any employee violating these prohibitions 5shall be subject to termination of employment.6    (9) An Administrator shall perform any and all duties that 7the Board shall assign him. The salary of the Administrator 8shall be determined by the Board and, in addition, he shall be 9reimbursed for all actual and necessary expenses incurred by 10him in discharge of his official duties. The Administrator 11shall keep records of all proceedings of the Board and shall 12preserve all records, books, documents and other papers 13belonging to the Board or entrusted to its care. The 14Administrator shall devote his full time to the duties of the 15office and shall not hold any other office or employment.16    (b) The Board shall have general responsibility for the 17implementation of this Act. Its duties include, without 18limitation, the following: 19        (1) To decide promptly and in reasonable order all 20    license applications. Any party aggrieved by an action of 21    the Board denying, suspending, revoking, restricting or 22    refusing to renew a license may request a hearing before 23    the Board. A request for a hearing must be made to the 24    Board in writing within 5 days after service of notice of 25    the action of the Board. Notice of the action of the Board 26    shall be served either by personal delivery or by   SB1704- 11 -LRB104 03002 LNS 13020 b1    certified mail, postage prepaid, to the aggrieved party. 2    Notice served by certified mail shall be deemed complete 3    on the business day following the date of such mailing. 4    The Board shall conduct any such hearings promptly and in 5    reasonable order; 6        (2) To conduct all hearings pertaining to civil 7    violations of this Act or rules and regulations 8    promulgated hereunder; 9        (3) To promulgate such rules and regulations as in its 10    judgment may be necessary to protect or enhance the 11    credibility and integrity of gambling operations 12    authorized by this Act and the regulatory process 13    hereunder; 14        (4) To provide for the establishment and collection of 15    all license and registration fees and taxes imposed by 16    this Act and the rules and regulations issued pursuant 17    hereto. All such fees and taxes shall be deposited into 18    the State Gaming Fund; 19        (5) To provide for the levy and collection of 20    penalties and fines for the violation of provisions of 21    this Act and the rules and regulations promulgated 22    hereunder. All such fines and penalties shall be deposited 23    into the Education Assistance Fund, created by Public Act 24    86-0018, of the State of Illinois; 25        (6) To be present through its inspectors and agents 26    any time gambling operations are conducted on any   SB1704- 12 -LRB104 03002 LNS 13020 b1    riverboat, in any casino, or at any organization gaming 2    facility for the purpose of certifying the revenue 3    thereof, receiving complaints from the public, and 4    conducting such other investigations into the conduct of 5    the gambling games and the maintenance of the equipment as 6    from time to time the Board may deem necessary and proper; 7        (7) To review and rule upon any complaint by a 8    licensee regarding any investigative procedures of the 9    State which are unnecessarily disruptive of gambling 10    operations. The need to inspect and investigate shall be 11    presumed at all times. The disruption of a licensee's 12    operations shall be proved by clear and convincing 13    evidence    , and establish that: (A) the procedures had no 14    reasonable law enforcement purposes, and (B) the 15    procedures were so disruptive as to unreasonably inhibit 16    gambling operations; 17        (8) To hold at least one meeting each quarter of the 18    fiscal year. In addition, special meetings may be called 19    by the Chairman or any 2 Board members upon 72 hours 20    written notice to each member. All Board meetings shall be 21    subject to the Open Meetings Act. Three members of the 22    Board shall constitute a quorum, and 3 votes shall be 23    required for any final determination by the Board. The 24    Board shall keep a complete and accurate record of all its 25    meetings. A majority of the members of the Board shall 26    constitute a quorum for the transaction of any business,   SB1704- 13 -LRB104 03002 LNS 13020 b1    for the performance of any duty, or for the exercise of any 2    power which this Act requires the Board members to 3    transact, perform or exercise en banc, except that, upon 4    order of the Board, one of the Board members or an 5    administrative law judge designated by the Board may 6    conduct any hearing provided for under this Act or by 7    Board rule and may recommend findings and decisions to the 8    Board. The Board member or administrative law judge 9    conducting such hearing shall have all powers and rights 10    granted to the Board in this Act. The record made at the 11    time of the hearing shall be reviewed by the Board, or a 12    majority thereof, and the findings and decision of the 13    majority of the Board shall constitute the order of the 14    Board in such case; 15        (9) To maintain records which are separate and 16    distinct from the records of any other State board or 17    commission. Such records shall be available for public 18    inspection and shall accurately reflect all Board 19    proceedings; 20        (10) To file a written annual report with the Governor 21    on or before July 1 each year and such additional reports 22    as the Governor may request. The annual report shall 23    include a statement of receipts and disbursements by the 24    Board, actions taken by the Board, and any additional 25    information and recommendations which the Board may deem 26    valuable or which the Governor may request;   SB1704- 14 -LRB104 03002 LNS 13020 b1        (11) (Blank); 2        (12) (Blank); 3        (13) To assume responsibility for administration and 4    enforcement of the Video Gaming Act;5        (13.1) To assume responsibility for the administration 6    and enforcement of operations at organization gaming 7    facilities pursuant to this Act and the Illinois Horse 8    Racing Act of 1975; 9        (13.2) To assume responsibility for the administration 10    and enforcement of the Sports Wagering Act; and 11        (14) To adopt, by rule, a code of conduct governing 12    Board members and employees that ensure, to the maximum 13    extent possible, that persons subject to this Code avoid 14    situations, relationships, or associations that may 15    represent or lead to a conflict of interest. 16    Internal controls and changes submitted by licensees must 17be reviewed and either approved or denied with cause within 90 18days after receipt of submission is deemed final by the 19Illinois Gaming Board. In the event an internal control 20submission or change does not meet the standards set by the 21Board, staff of the Board must provide technical assistance to 22the licensee to rectify such deficiencies within 90 days after 23the initial submission and the revised submission must be 24reviewed and approved or denied with cause within 90 days 25after the date the revised submission is deemed final by the 26Board. For the purposes of this paragraph, "with cause" means   SB1704- 15 -LRB104 03002 LNS 13020 b1that the approval of the submission would jeopardize the 2integrity of gaming. In the event the Board staff has not acted 3within the timeframe, the submission shall be deemed approved.4    (c) The Board shall have jurisdiction over and shall 5supervise all gambling operations governed by this Act. The 6Board shall have all powers necessary and proper to fully and 7effectively execute the provisions of this Act, including, but 8not limited to, the following: 9        (1) To investigate applicants and determine the 10    eligibility of applicants for licenses and to select among 11    competing applicants the applicants which best serve the 12    interests of the citizens of Illinois. 13        (2) To have jurisdiction and supervision over all 14    riverboat gambling operations authorized under this Act 15    and all persons in places where gambling operations are 16    conducted. 17        (3) To promulgate rules and regulations for the 18    purpose of administering the provisions of this Act and to 19    prescribe rules, regulations and conditions under which 20    all gambling operations subject to this Act shall be 21    conducted. Such rules and regulations are to provide for 22    the prevention of practices detrimental to the public 23    interest and for the best interests of riverboat gambling, 24    including rules and regulations regarding the inspection 25    of organization gaming facilities, casinos, and 26    riverboats, and the review of any permits or licenses   SB1704- 16 -LRB104 03002 LNS 13020 b1    necessary to operate a riverboat, casino, or organization 2    gaming facility under any laws or regulations applicable 3    to riverboats, casinos, or organization gaming facilities 4    and to impose penalties for violations thereof. 5        (4) To enter the office, riverboats, casinos, 6    organization gaming facilities, and other facilities, or 7    other places of business of a licensee, where evidence of 8    the compliance or noncompliance with the provisions of 9    this Act is likely to be found. 10        (5) To investigate alleged violations of this Act or 11    the rules of the Board and to take appropriate 12    disciplinary action against a licensee or a holder of an 13    occupational license for a violation, or institute 14    appropriate legal action for enforcement, or both. 15        (6) To adopt standards for the licensing of all 16    persons and entities under this Act, as well as for 17    electronic or mechanical gambling games, and to establish 18    fees for such licenses. 19        (7) To adopt appropriate standards for all 20    organization gaming facilities, riverboats, casinos, and 21    other facilities authorized under this Act. 22        (8) To require that the records, including financial 23    or other statements of any licensee under this Act, shall 24    be kept in such manner as prescribed by the Board and that 25    any such licensee involved in the ownership or management 26    of gambling operations submit to the Board an annual   SB1704- 17 -LRB104 03002 LNS 13020 b1    balance sheet and profit and loss statement, list of the 2    stockholders or other persons having a 1% or greater 3    beneficial interest in the gambling activities of each 4    licensee, and any other information the Board deems 5    necessary in order to effectively administer this Act and 6    all rules, regulations, orders and final decisions 7    promulgated under this Act. 8        (9) To conduct hearings, issue subpoenas for the 9    attendance of witnesses and subpoenas duces tecum for the 10    production of books, records and other pertinent documents 11    in accordance with the Illinois Administrative Procedure 12    Act, and to administer oaths and affirmations to the 13    witnesses, when, in the judgment of the Board, it is 14    necessary to administer or enforce this Act or the Board 15    rules. 16        (10) To prescribe a form to be used by any licensee 17    involved in the ownership or management of gambling 18    operations as an application for employment for their 19    employees. 20        (11) To revoke or suspend licenses, as the Board may 21    see fit and in compliance with applicable laws of the 22    State regarding administrative procedures, and to review 23    applications for the renewal of licenses. The Board may 24    suspend an owners license or an organization gaming 25    license without notice or hearing upon a determination 26    that the safety or health of patrons or employees is   SB1704- 18 -LRB104 03002 LNS 13020 b1    jeopardized by continuing a gambling operation conducted 2    under that license. The suspension may remain in effect 3    until the Board determines that the cause for suspension 4    has been abated. The Board may revoke an owners license or 5    organization gaming license upon a determination that the 6    licensee has not made satisfactory progress toward abating 7    the hazard. 8        (12) To eject or exclude or authorize the ejection or 9    exclusion of, any person from gambling facilities where 10    that person is in violation of this Act, rules and 11    regulations thereunder, or final orders of the Board, or 12    where such person's conduct or reputation is such that his 13    or her presence within the gambling facilities may, in the 14    opinion of the Board, call into question the honesty and 15    integrity of the gambling operations or interfere with the 16    orderly conduct thereof; provided that the propriety of 17    such ejection or exclusion is subject to subsequent 18    hearing by the Board. 19        (13) To require all licensees of gambling operations 20    to utilize a cashless wagering system whereby all players' 21    money is converted to tokens, electronic cards, or chips 22    which shall be used only for wagering in the gambling 23    establishment. 24        (14) (Blank). 25        (15) To suspend, revoke or restrict licenses, to 26    require the removal of a licensee or an employee of a   SB1704- 19 -LRB104 03002 LNS 13020 b1    licensee for a violation of this Act or a Board rule or for 2    engaging in a fraudulent practice, and to impose civil 3    penalties of up to $5,000 against individuals and up to 4    $10,000 or an amount equal to the daily gross receipts, 5    whichever is larger, against licensees for each violation 6    of any provision of the Act, any rules adopted by the 7    Board, any order of the Board or any other action which, in 8    the Board's discretion, is a detriment or impediment to 9    gambling operations. 10        (16) To hire employees to gather information, conduct 11    investigations and carry out any other tasks contemplated 12    under this Act. 13        (17) To establish minimum levels of insurance to be 14    maintained by licensees. 15        (18) To authorize a licensee to sell or serve 16    alcoholic liquors, wine or beer as defined in the Liquor 17    Control Act of 1934 on board a riverboat or in a casino and 18    to have exclusive authority to establish the hours for 19    sale and consumption of alcoholic liquor on board a 20    riverboat or in a casino, notwithstanding any provision of 21    the Liquor Control Act of 1934 or any local ordinance, and 22    regardless of whether the riverboat makes excursions. The 23    establishment of the hours for sale and consumption of 24    alcoholic liquor on board a riverboat or in a casino is an 25    exclusive power and function of the State. A home rule 26    unit may not establish the hours for sale and consumption   SB1704- 20 -LRB104 03002 LNS 13020 b1    of alcoholic liquor on board a riverboat or in a casino. 2    This subdivision (18) is a denial and limitation of home 3    rule powers and functions under subsection (h) of Section 4    6 of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution. 5        (19) After consultation with the U.S. Army Corps of 6    Engineers, to establish binding emergency orders upon the 7    concurrence of a majority of the members of the Board 8    regarding the navigability of water, relative to 9    excursions, in the event of extreme weather conditions, 10    acts of God or other extreme circumstances. 11        (20) To delegate the execution of any of its powers 12    under this Act for the purpose of administering and 13    enforcing this Act and the rules adopted by the Board.14        (20.5) To approve any contract entered into on its 15    behalf. 16        (20.6) To appoint investigators to conduct 17    investigations, searches, seizures, arrests, and other 18    duties imposed under this Act, as deemed necessary by the 19    Board. These investigators have and may exercise all of 20    the rights and powers of peace officers, provided that 21    these powers shall be limited to offenses or violations 22    occurring or committed in a casino, in an organization 23    gaming facility, or on a riverboat or dock, as defined in 24    subsections (d) and (f) of Section 4, or as otherwise 25    provided by this Act or any other law.26        (20.7) To contract with the Illinois State Police for   SB1704- 21 -LRB104 03002 LNS 13020 b1    the use of trained and qualified State police officers and 2    with the Department of Revenue for the use of trained and 3    qualified Department of Revenue investigators to conduct 4    investigations, searches, seizures, arrests, and other 5    duties imposed under this Act and to exercise all of the 6    rights and powers of peace officers, provided that the 7    powers of Department of Revenue investigators under this 8    subdivision (20.7) shall be limited to offenses or 9    violations occurring or committed in a casino, in an 10    organization gaming facility, or on a riverboat or dock, 11    as defined in subsections (d) and (f) of Section 4, or as 12    otherwise provided by this Act or any other law. In the 13    event the Illinois State Police or the Department of 14    Revenue is unable to fill contracted police or 15    investigative positions, the Board may appoint 16    investigators to fill those positions pursuant to 17    subdivision (20.6). 18        (21) To adopt rules concerning the conduct of gaming 19    pursuant to an organization gaming license issued under 20    this Act. 21        (22) To have the same jurisdiction and supervision 22    over casinos and organization gaming facilities as the 23    Board has over riverboats, including, but not limited to, 24    the power to (i) investigate, review, and approve 25    contracts as that power is applied to riverboats, (ii) 26    adopt rules for administering the provisions of this Act,   SB1704- 22 -LRB104 03002 LNS 13020 b1    (iii) adopt standards for the licensing of all persons 2    involved with a casino or organization gaming facility, 3    (iv) investigate alleged violations of this Act by any 4    person involved with a casino or organization gaming 5    facility, and (v) require that records, including 6    financial or other statements of any casino or 7    organization gaming facility, shall be kept in such manner 8    as prescribed by the Board. 9        (23) To take any other action as may be reasonable or 10    appropriate to enforce this Act and the rules adopted by 11    the Board.12    (d) The Board may seek and shall receive the cooperation 13of the Illinois State Police in conducting background 14investigations of applicants and in fulfilling its 15responsibilities under this Section. Costs incurred by the 16Illinois State Police as a result of such cooperation shall be 17paid by the Board in conformance with the requirements of 18Section 2605-400 of the Illinois State Police Law.19    (e) The Board must authorize to each investigator and to 20any other employee of the Board exercising the powers of a 21peace officer a distinct badge that, on its face, (i) clearly 22states that the badge is authorized by the Board and (ii) 23contains a unique identifying number. No other badge shall be 24authorized by the Board.25(Source: P.A. 101-31, eff. 6-28-19; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 26102-1129, eff. 2-10-23.)